Wisconsin, session 2025, SB657.
do enact as follows:SB657,11Section 1. 103.465 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB657,2,32103.465 (title) Restrictive covenants Covenants not to compete in 3employment contracts.SB657,24Section 2. 103.465 of the statutes is renumbered 103.465 (1) and amended to 5read:SB657,2,146103.465 (1) Covenants not to compete; generally. A Except as provided 7in sub. (2), a covenant by an employee, assistant, servant, or agent not to compete 8with his or her employer or principal during the term of the employment or agency, 9or after the termination of that employment or agency, within a specified territory 10and during a specified time is lawful and enforceable only if the restrictions 11imposed are reasonably necessary for the protection of the employer or principal. 12Any covenant, described in this section, imposing subsection that imposes an 13unreasonable restraint is illegal, void, and unenforceable even as to any part of the 14covenant or performance that would be a reasonable restraint.SB657,315Section 3. 103.465 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB657,2,1716103.465 (2) Covenants not to compete; medical practitioners. (a) In 17this subsection:SB657,2,19181. “Advanced practice nurse prescriber” means an advanced practice nurse 19who is certified under s. 441.16 (2).SB657,3,212. “Medical practitioner” means an advanced practice nurse prescriber, a 2physician, a physician assistant, or a psychologist.SB657,3,333. “Physician” has the meaning given in s. 448.01 (5).SB657,3,444. “Physician assistant” has the meaning given in s. 448.971 (2).SB657,3,555. “Psychologist” means an individual licensed under ch. 455.SB657,3,116(b) A covenant by a medical practitioner not to compete with his or her 7employer after the termination of the employment imposes an unreasonable 8restraint and is illegal, void, and unenforceable, even as to any part of the covenant 9that would be a reasonable restraint, if the covenant includes a restriction that 10prohibits working as a medical practitioner for more than 24 consecutive months 11after the first day of the medical practitioner’s employment with the employer.SB657,3,1612(c) A covenant by a medical practitioner not to compete with his or her 13employer after the termination of the employment shall be considered an 14unreasonable restraint and shall be considered illegal, void, and unenforceable if 15the medical practitioner’s employment is terminated for any reason by the 16employer.SB657,417Section 4. 103.465 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 18.... (this act), is amended to read:SB657,3,2019103.465 (2) (a) 1. “Advanced practice nurse prescriber” means an advanced 20practice nurse who is was certified under s. 441.16 (2), 2023 stats.SB657,521Section 5. 103.465 (2) (a) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:SB657,3,2322103.465 (2) (a) 1m. “Advanced practice registered nurse” means an individual 23who is licensed under s. 441.09.SB657,61Section 6. 103.465 (2) (a) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2.... (this act), is amended to read:SB657,4,53103.465 (2) (a) 2. “Medical practitioner” means an advanced practice 4registered nurse, an advanced practice nurse prescriber, a physician, a physician 5assistant, or a psychologist.SB657,76Section 7. Initial applicability.SB657,4,107(1) Covenants not to compete; medical practitioners. This act first 8applies to a covenant by a medical practitioner, as defined in s. 103.465 (2) (a) 2., not 9to compete with his or her employer that is entered into, or extended, modified, or 10renewed, on the effective date of this section.SB657,811Section 8. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 12publication, except as follows:SB657,4,1613(1) The creation of s. 103.465 (2) (a) 1m. and the amendment of s. 103.465 (2) 14(a) 1. and 2. take effect on the day after publication, or on the first day of the 13th 15month beginning after publication of 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (Assembly Bill 257), 16whichever is later.SB657,4,1717